test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AY_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲áy - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AY_STEM_1

     k̲áy+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲áy
     k̲áy+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áyga
     k̲áy+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy
     k̲áy+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áygang
     k̲áy+V+DIRECT+PAST: k̲áygan
     k̲áy+V+RELATIVE: k̲áys
     k̲áy+V+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áyang
     k̲áy+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áygang
     k̲áy+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áyganggang
     k̲áy+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áygangang
     k̲áy+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áygiinii
     k̲áy+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áygaangaa
     k̲áy+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áygaangaan
     k̲áy+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲áyäsaa
     k̲áy+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲áyäs
     k̲áy+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲áyäsaang
     k̲áy+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲áyäsga
     k̲áy+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áyäsaas
     k̲áy+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áyäsaa.ang
     k̲áy+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áyang k̲asa'áa
     k̲áy+V+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áyang k̲asa'áang
     k̲áy+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áyang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲áy+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áyang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲áy+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áy'uuj
     k̲áy+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'uujang
     k̲áy+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲áyäsaa'uujang
     k̲áy+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲áy'us
     k̲áy+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áy'ujaa
     k̲áy+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'uujaangaa
     k̲áy+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áyäsaa'us
     k̲áy+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲áyäsaa'ahlans
     k̲áy+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲áyäseehl
     k̲áy+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲áy'uu
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áy'waa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'waa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'waang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲áy'wägan
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áy'aawaa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲áy'aawaan
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲áy'waas
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲áy'aawaas
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áy'waa.ang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áy'aawaa.ang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áygang'waa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áygang'waang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áygang'waa.ang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'wägiinii
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'wägaangaa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'wägaangaan
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲áy'waaäsaa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲áy'waaäs
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲áy'waaäsaang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲áy'waaäsga
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áy'waaäsaas
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áy'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áy'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áy'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áy'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áy'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áy'waa'uuj
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'waa'uujang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲áy'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲áy'waa'us
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áy'waa'ujaa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áy'waaäsaa'us
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲áy'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲áy'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲áy'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲áy'waa'ahlans
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲áy'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲áy'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲áy'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲áy'waa'ahl
     k̲áy+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲áy'waaäseehl
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲áy'ang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áy'angga
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'anggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: k̲áy'anggan
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áy'aangaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲áy'aangaan
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: k̲áy'ans
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲áy'aangaas
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áy'angang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áy'aangaa.ang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áy'anggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áygang'anggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áygang'angang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'anggiinii
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'anggaangaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'anggaangaan
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲áy'angäsaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲áy'angäs
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲áy'angäsaang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲áy'angäsga
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áy'angäsaas
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áy'angäsaa.ang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áyang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áyang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áyang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áyang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'uuj
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'uujang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲áy'angäsaa'uujang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'us
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áy'ang'ujaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'ang'uujaangaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áy'angäsaa'us
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲áy'aang'ahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲áy'aang'ahlanggan
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'aang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲áy'angäsaa'ahlans
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲áy'aang'ahlans
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲áy'aangaa'ahlang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲áy'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲áy'aangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: k̲áy'aang'ahl
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲áy'angäseehl
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲áy'ang'uu
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'waa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'waa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'waang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲áy'ang'wägan
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áy'ang'aawaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲áy'ang'aawaan
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲áy'ang'waas
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲áy'ang'aawaas
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áy'ang'waa.ang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áy'ang'aawaa.ang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áygang'ang'waa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲áygang'ang'waang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áygang'ang'waa.ang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'ang'wägiinii
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'ang'wägaangaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'ang'wägaangaan
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲áy'ang'waaäsaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲áy'ang'waaäs
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲áy'ang'waaäsaang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲áy'ang'waaäsga
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áy'ang'waaäsaas
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áy'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áy'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲áy'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áy'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲áy'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'waa'uuj
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'waa'uujang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲áy'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'waa'us
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áy'ang'waa'ujaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲áy'ang'waaäsaa'us
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲áy'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áy'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲áy'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲áy'ang'waa'ahlans
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲áy'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲áy'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲áy'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲áy'ang'waa'ahl
     k̲áy+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲áy'ang'waaäseehl
